Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 106.9, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 263, O.S.L. 2023 (20 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 106.9), is amended to read as follows:
Section 106.9. A. 1. Each court reporter regularly engaged by
the district court, or the Workers' Compensation Court of Existing
Claims, or the Corporation Commission shall be paid a salary
pursuant to the salary schedule established by the annual
appropriation for the district courts and Corporation Commission and
in accordance with the job description for the position to which
appointed. For fiscal year 2023 and each fiscal year thereafter,
each court reporter shall receive an annual salary of Fifty-three
Thousand Dollars ($53,000.00).
2. Each court reporter regularly engaged by the Corporation
Commission shall be paid a salary determined by the Director of
Administration of the Corporation Commission that is commensurate
with the court reporter's qualifications, experience, and additional
duties.

B. In addition to their base salaries, official court reporters
who are certified or licensed shorthand reporters and those acting
shorthand reporters pursuant to paragraph 3 of Section 106.3B of
this title shall be paid annually the sum of Four Hundred Dollars
($400.00) for each year of service to the district court, the
Workers' Compensation Court, and the Workers' Compensation Court of
Existing Claims and the Corporation Commission, with a maximum of
twenty (20) years of service only to be used for the purpose of
longevity, not to exceed Eight Thousand Dollars ($8,000.00) per
year, payable monthly. For the purpose of payment for longevity,
"years of service" is defined as all years served as a certified or
licensed court reporter in the district court, the Workers'
Compensation Court, and the Workers' Compensation Court of Existing
Claims and the Corporation Commission after June 30, 1978.
Longevity payments shall be made on July 1 of each year following
completion of the first year of service as defined herein.
C. In addition to their base salaries, official court reporters
eligible for longevity payments pursuant to subsection B of this
section shall be paid an annual equipment allowance of Three
Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00). Payments for such allowance shall be
made on July 1 of each year following completion of the first year
of service as defined in subsection B of this section.
D. In addition to their base salaries, official court reporters
who are certified shorthand reporters shall be paid the following:
1. The sum of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per year,
payable monthly, to any official court reporter who is a Registered
Professional Reporter (RPR), as recognized by the State Board of
Examiners of Certified Shorthand Reporters. To qualify as a RPR, an
official court reporter shall have a proficiency level in reporting
testimony and proceedings of a speed of not less than two hundred
twenty-five (225) words per minute in taking a question-and-answer-
type dictation, two hundred (200) words per minute in taking a jury
charge and one hundred eighty (180) words per minute in taking
literary material, shall pass a Written Knowledge Test with a score
of at least seventy percent (70%), all as determined by an
examination recognized by the Board, and shall complete thirty (30)
hours of continuing education per three-year cycle commencing at the
date of recognition;
2. The sum of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per year,
payable monthly, to any official court reporter who is a Registered
ENR. H. B. NO. 3177 Page 2

Merit Reporter (RMR), as recognized by the State Board of Examiners
of Certified Shorthand Reporters. To qualify as a RMR, an official
court reporter shall have a proficiency level in reporting testimony
and proceedings of a speed of not less than two hundred sixty (260)
words per minute in taking a question-and-answer-type dictation, two
hundred forty (240) words per minute in taking a jury charge and two
hundred (200) words per minute in taking literary material, shall
pass a Written Knowledge Test with a score of at least seventy
percent (70%), all as determined by an examination recognized by the
Board, and shall complete thirty (30) hours of continuing education
per three-year cycle commencing at the date of recognition;
3. The sum of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per year,
payable monthly, to any official court reporter who is a Registered
Diplomat Reporter (RDR), as recognized by the State Board of
Examiners of Certified Shorthand Reporters, and who completes thirty
(30) hours of continuing education per three-year cycle commencing
at the date of recognition;
4. The sum of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per year,
payable monthly, to any official court reporter who is a Certified
Realtime Reporter (CRR), as recognized by the State Board of
Examiners of Certified Shorthand Reporters, and who completes thirty
(30) hours of continuing education per three-year cycle commencing
at the date of recognition; or
5. Any official court reporter who is the holder of more than
one certification shall be compensated in the additional amounts
specified in paragraphs 1 through 4 of this subsection for each
certification up to a maximum of Eight Thousand Dollars ($8,000.00)
per year over and above the reporter's base salary, payable monthly.
E. Court reporters temporarily employed by the district court,
Workers' Compensation Court of Existing Claims, or Corporation
Commission shall be compensated by the court fund of the court which
they serve at a rate to be set by such court. In addition, court
reporters temporarily employed pursuant to this subsection who are
required by the terms of their employment to travel outside their
county of residence shall receive reimbursement for mileage actually
and necessarily traveled to and from the place of attendance at a
rate not to exceed the rate of reimbursement specified in the State
Travel Reimbursement Act for state employees. Any travel
reimbursement shall be paid from the court fund of the court where
the service of the temporarily employed court reporter is provided.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3177 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 10th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3177 Page 4